Massachusetts, session 194th, S2323.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 Section 142M is hereby amended by striking the following:-- "on or before
April 30, 2012" and by further striking in both instances that it occurs:-- "registered after April
30, 2012".
of 1